Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 2. Banking Practices.

Sec. 06.15.150.
Surplus requirements.

The department may not issue a charter until there is deposited not less than $50,000 in cash to the credit of the mutual bank. The amount of the deposit constitutes the initial surplus. All amounts advanced as initial surplus shall be evidenced by transferable deferred payment certificates. The department shall approve the maturity, amount of installment repayment, and interest rate of each certificate.

History.

(§ 8 a ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.160.
Additions to surplus.

As soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year during its first 10 years of operation, each mutual bank shall credit to surplus at least 10 percent of its net earnings before interest for the preceding fiscal year. At the close of each fiscal year thereafter, each mutual bank shall credit to surplus a proportion of its net earnings for the preceding fiscal year, not exceeding 10 percent, as the department may prescribe by regulation. These credits to surplus shall be made only until surplus equals 12 percent of deposit liabilities. Thereafter and so long as surplus equals 12 percent of deposit liabilities the mutual bank may credit further amounts to surplus as it may determine.

History.

(§ 8 b ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.170.
Limitation on use of surplus.

The surplus of an operating mutual bank may be used only for the purpose of meeting losses.

History.

(§ 8 c ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.180.
Borrowing.

A mutual bank may borrow from any source and in any manner amounts without limit that are required to satisfy its obligations to its depositors. It may borrow for other purposes an aggregate outstanding amount not to exceed

five percent of its total assets at the time of borrowing, exclusive of any sums borrowed under AS

06.15.140

—

06.15.170

;

15 percent of its total assets if borrowing from the Federal Home Loan Bank.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1962)

Sec. 06.15.190.
Deposits.

A mutual bank may accept savings deposits to be held solely and absolutely in its own right by or in trust or other fiduciary capacity for any person, including an adult or minor individual, male or female, single or married, a partnership, nonprofit organization, association, fiduciary, corporation, or political subdivision or public or governmental unit.
The bank may issue a passbook or other evidence of its obligation to repay the savings deposits.

History.

(§ 10 a ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1962)

Sec. 06.15.210.
Right to reject, repay, and classify deposits.

A mutual bank may

reject any sums offered for deposit;

repay any deposit at any time; and

classify and differentiate among deposits on any bases that it may determine.

History.

(§ 10 b ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.220.
Interest on deposits.

A mutual bank may pay interest on deposits from net earnings and undivided profits at the rates and intervals that its trustees approve.

History.

(§ 10 c ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 1962; am § 14 ch 157 SLA 1970)

Sec. 06.15.230.
Withdrawal of deposits.

A mutual bank may at a time by resolution of its board of trustees require that up to 90 days’ advance notice be given to it by each depositor before the withdrawal of any deposit or portion thereof. If the board of trustees adopts a resolution, a deposit does not need to be paid until the expiration of the notice period specified in the resolution. A mutual bank shall notify the department in writing on the day of the adoption of the resolution. Notwithstanding adoption of the resolution, a mutual bank may permit withdrawal of all or a part of any deposit prior to the expiration of the notice period prescribed by the resolution. The resolution may be rescinded at any time.

History.

(§ 10 d ch 132 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 6, art. 2.

Sec. 06.15.240.
Investments authorized.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and regulations under this chapter, a mutual bank may invest in

obligations of the United States and those for which the faith of the United States is pledged to provide for the payment of the interest and principal, obligations for which annual contributions to be paid under contract by the United States government or any of its instrumentalities in accordance with an Act of Congress entitled the “Housing Act of 1949,” are pledged as security for the payment of the interest and principal, and obligations of any agency of the United States;

obligations of any state of the United States and those for which the faith of any state of the United States is pledged to provide for the payment of the interest and principal;

obligations of a city, village, town, county, department, agency, district, authority, commission or other public body of any state of the United States, subject to the exercise of the same degree of care and prudence that persons prompted by self-interest generally exercise in their own affairs;

any property improvement note issued under the provisions of Title I of the National Housing Act and any other real property improvement note in a principal amount not in excess of $15,000, not including interest;

obligations of the Dominion of Canada or provinces of the Dominion of Canada payable in United States funds;

the stocks, bonds, and other securities of

a corporation licensed under AS 10.13; or

a corporation attempting to become licensed under AS 10.13 if the corporation intends to use the proceeds to fulfill the tasks necessary to become licensed under AS 10.13.

History.

(§ 11 a (1) — (5) ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 134 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 06.15.250.
Investment in first mortgages.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and regulations under this chapter, a mutual bank may invest in first mortgages on unencumbered real property, including leasehold estates, subject to the following limitations:

an investment in mortgages executed by any one mortgagor may not exceed in the aggregate two percent of the assets of the mutual bank at the time the investment is made, or $37,500 on a single family dwelling or $50,000 on a multiple family dwelling or other improved realty, whichever is greater;

an investment in any one mortgage may not exceed two percent of the assets of the mutual bank at the time the investment is made, or as specified in (1) of this subsection, whichever is greater, or more than 80 percent of the appraised value of a one- to four-family residence securing a conventional loan; however, a mutual bank may make 95 percent of appraised value loans if the term of the loan does not exceed 30 years from the date of the first payment, and if the first payment date is no later than 60 days following final disbursement of the loan, and the loan is secured by an amortized mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument under the terms of which the installment payments are sufficient to amortize the entire principal of the loan within the period ending on the date of its maturity and, in addition, the loan is either

insured by mortgage insurance in an amount equal to 20 percent of the loan issued by a mortgage insurer authorized to do business in Alaska; or

the loan is secured in addition to the amortized mortgage by a savings account held by the lending institution in an amount equal to 10 percent of the loan or other collateral acceptable to the department;

except as provided in (2) of this subsection, an investment may not be made in a conventional loan secured by a mortgage on a one- to four-family residence unless the mortgaged property is located inside this state and the mortgage has a maturity not exceeding 30 years from the date of the first payment, and if the first payment date is no later than 60 days following final disbursement of the loan;

an investment may not be made in a conventional loan if the aggregate unpaid principal of all conventional loans exceeds 80 percent of deposits plus all borrowings from the Federal Home Loan Bank;

participation in mortgage loans with others as co-mortgagees may not be permitted except with one or more financial institutions, trusts, or pension funds;

an investment may not be made in a mortgage upon a leasehold unless

the leasehold has an unexpired term of not less than 21 years;

the principal amount of the mortgage loan is not in excess of 70 percent of the appraised value of the leasehold; and

provision is made for complete amortization of the loan within an unexpired term by periodic payments as the department may prescribe.

In this section, “real property” includes a manufactured home that has become real property under AS

34.85.010

. In this subsection, “manufactured home” has the meaning given in AS

45.29.102

.

History.

(§ 11 a (6) ch 132 SLA 1960; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 60 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 1965; am §§ 1, 2 ch 47 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 7 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, “subsection” was substituted for “section” in (a)(2) and (3) of this section to reflect the 2012 addition of subsection (b).

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 6, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (b).

Sec. 06.15.260.
Investment in bankers’ acceptances.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and regulations under this chapter a mutual bank may invest in bankers’ acceptances that have been accepted by a bank, trust company, national bank, investment company, or banking corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, which is a member of the Federal Reserve System.

History.

(§ 11 a(7) ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.270.
Investment in corporate securities.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and regulations under this chapter a mutual bank may invest in corporate securities, subject to the exercise of the same degree of care and prudence that persons prompted by self-interest generally exercise in their own affairs, and subject to the following limitations:

a mutual bank may not invest in any corporate obligation, other than under AS

06.15.280

, that will mature by its terms within one year from the date of its issuance, or if issued or made in series or repayable in installments, has an average maturity of less than one year;

a mutual bank may not invest in

stocks an amount greater than 10 percent of its assets or 100 percent of its surplus and undivided profits, whichever is less;

common stock an amount greater than six percent of its assets or 60 percent of its surplus and undivided profits, whichever is less;

the common and preferred stocks of one issuer an amount greater than one percent of its assets; or

more than two percent of the total issued and outstanding shares of stock of any one issuer.

The limitations of this section do not apply to a mutual bank’s investments in a wholly owned subsidiary corporation that owns or leases real or personal property for the purpose of providing a building and facilities to be used primarily for the conduct of the authorized banking activities of the mutual bank.

History.

(§ 11 a(8) ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 former paragraph (3) of this section was renumbered as subsection (b) and the remainder of the section was designated as (a).

Sec. 06.15.280.
Investment in promissory notes.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and regulations under this chapter, a mutual bank may invest in a promissory note, subject to the following limitations:

a promissory note payable to the order of the mutual bank that is

secured by the assignment of one or more mortgages in which a mutual bank may invest if the amount so invested in the note does not exceed 90 percent of the principal sum secured by the mortgages; the assignment of a mortgage taken as security for the note shall be recorded or registered in the office of the proper recording officer of the recording precinct in which the real property described in the mortgage is located;

secured by any of the bonds or other securities in which a mutual bank may invest if the amount invested in the note does not exceed 90 percent of the market value of the bonds or other securities at the time of the investment;

secured by an insurance policy to the extent of the policy’s cash surrender value;

made by a savings and loans association that has been incorporated three years or more and has an accumulated capital of at least $50,000;

a promissory note payable to the order of the mutual bank within one year from its date that is secured by the assignment of a deposit in a federally insured thrift institution if the amount of the investment in the note is not in excess of the amount of the deposit.

History.

(§ 11 a(9) ch 132 SLA 1960; am §§ 8, 9 ch 60 SLA 1962)